Maryland, session 2025, HB0177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–905.
(a) A person may not take and break open a letter that is not addressed to the
person without permission from the person to whom the letter is addressed or the personal
representative of the addressee’s estate.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0177*

HOUSE BILL 177
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction:
(1) is subject to imprisonment for 6 days and a fine of $15; AND
(2) SHALL PAY ANY ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS RELATED TO
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) FOR A CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION INVOLVING THE OPENING OF
A LETTER DELIVERED OR INTENDED FOR DELIVERY BY THE UNITED STATES
POSTAL SERVICE, THE COURT SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE UNITED STATES
POSTMASTER GENERAL OF THE CONVICTION.
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY
SERVICE COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO OR INTENDED FOR
DELIVERY TO ANOTHER WITH THE INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OTHER OF THE MAIL OR
PACKAGE.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION:
(1) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS; AND
(2) SHALL PAY ANY ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS RELATED TO
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) FOR A CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION INVOLVING A LETTER OR
PACKAGE DELIVERED OR INTENDED FOR DELIVERY BY THE UNITED STATES
POSTAL SERVICE, THE COURT SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE UNITED STATES
POSTMASTER GENERAL OF THE CONVICTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.